New York, session 2025-2026, A6035.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 17 of section 1012 of the racing, pari-mutuel 2 wagering and breeding law, as amended by chapter 174 of the laws of 3 2013, is amended and a new subdivision 19 is added to read as follows: 4 17. For the purposes of this section, "telephone wagering accounts" 5 shall mean and include all those wagers which utilize any wired or wire- 6 less communications device, including but not limited to wireline tele- 7 phones, wireless telephones and the internet, to display live races and 8 special events and transmit the placement of wagers on races and special 9 events offered by any regional off-track betting corporation, and any 10 harness, thoroughbred, quarter horse racing association or corporation 11 licensed or franchised to conduct pari-mutuel racing in this state. 12 19. The provisions of this section shall not be subject to the 13 provisions of section one thousand three of this article insofar as 14 those provisions require the participation as a contracting party or 15 otherwise of the regional off-track betting corporation, however no 16 races or special events shall be displayed without the express consent 17 of the originator of the races or special events. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07684-01-5